Oklahoma, session 2026, SB11.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 17-116.23 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Any person receiving benefits from the Teachers’ Retirement


System of Oklahoma as of June 30, 2025, who continues to receive


benefits on or after the effective date of this act, shall receive a


five percent (5%) increase in benefits.




60-1-110 RD 12/6/2024 9:56:33 AM









Req. No. 110 Page 1